Utah statutes.
78B-6-1001.   Right of action for waste -- Damages.
If a guardian, tenant for life or years, joint tenant, or tenant in common, of
real property commits waste on the property, any person aggrieved by the waste
may bring an action against the person.  Judgment in the action may include
treble damages.
